District of Columbia statutes.
50-2303.02a

Automated parking enforcement system.

(a)

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term “automated parking enforcement system” means equipment that takes a film or digital camera-based photograph which is linked with a violation detection system that synchronizes the taking of a photograph with the occurrence of a parking infraction. Recorded images taken by an automated parking enforcement system are prima facie evidence of an infraction and may be submitted without authentication.

(b)

The Mayor is authorized to use an automated parking enforcement system to detect parking infractions. Violations detected by an automated parking enforcement system shall constitute parking violations. Proof of an infraction may be evidenced by information obtained through the use of an automated parking enforcement system.

(c)

Notwithstanding other provisions of law or regulation, citations resulting from an automated parking enforcement system shall be limited to warning citations during the first 45 days that automated parking enforcement is used on any given street sweeper route. The automated parking enforcement system program shall not be implemented until a warning citation is developed and a warning citation process is put in place.

History

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, § 302
as added Aug. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-217, § 2(a), 55 DCR 7513

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2(a) of Street Sweeping Improvement Enforcement Temporary Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Law 17-218, August 15, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 9902).